Washington statutes.
RCW 43.33.030

Records—Administrative and clerical assistance.

The state finance committee shall keep a full and complete public record of its proceedings in appropriate books of record.

The state treasurer shall provide administrative and clerical assistance for the state finance committee.

[ 1981 c 3 s 24; 1965 c 8 s 43.33.030. Prior: 1961 c 300 s 4; 1907 c 12 s 2; RRS s 5537.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.